el: Μέγεθος θαλάμου: Πολύ μεγάλο; Μεγάλο; Μεσαίο; Μικρό; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tamanho da câmara: Extragrande; Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Outro
pt-PT: Tamanho da câmara: Extra grande; Grande; Médio; Pequeno; Outro
ro-RO: Dimensiunea camerei: Foarte mare; Mare; Medie; Mică; Altele
hu: Fúvókabelső mérete: Extra nagy; Nagy; Közepes; Kicsi; Egyéb
cs: Velikost komory: Extra velká; Velká; Střední; Malá; Jiná
ru: Размер камеры: Очень большой; Большой; Средний; Маленький; Другое
sl-SI: Velikost komore: Zelo velika; Velika; Srednja; Majhna; Drugo
fr: Taille de la chambre: Très grand; Grand; Moyen; Petit; Autre
vi: Kích thước buồng: Rất lớn; Lớn; Trung bình; Nhỏ; Khác
th: ขนาดโพรงภายในปากเป่า: ใหญ่พิเศษ; ใหญ่; กลาง; เล็ก; อื่นๆ
es: Tamaño de la cámara: Extragrande; Grande; Mediana; Pequeña; Otra
ja: チャンバーサイズ: 特大; 大; 中; 小; その他
sk-SK: Veľkosť komory: Extra veľká; Veľká; Stredná; Malá; Iné
da: Kammerets størrelse: Ekstra stor; Stor; Medium; Lille; Andet
de: Kammergröße: Extra groß; Groß; Mittel; Klein; Sonstiges
sv: Kammarens storlek: Extra stor; Stor; Medium; Liten; Övrigt
en: Chamber size: Extra large; Large; Medium; Small; Other
it: Camera taglia: Extra grande; Grande; Media; Piccola; Altro
lt-LT: Kameros dydis: Ypač didelis; Didelis; Vidutinis; Mažas; Kita
tr: Hazne boyutu: Ekstra büyük; Büyük; Orta; Küçük; Diğer
bg-BG: Размер на камерата: Много голям; Голям; Среден; Малък; Други
pl: Rozmiar komory: Bardzo duża; Duża; Średnia; Mała; Inna
fi: Kammion koko: Erittäin suuri; Suuri; Keskikokoinen; Pieni; Muu
zh-CN: 腔室尺寸: 加大号; 大号; 中号; 小号; 其他
zh-TW: 內膛尺寸: 特大; 大; 中; 小; 其他
ko: 챔버 크기: 특대형; 대형; 중형; 소형; 기타
nb: Kammerets størrelse: Ekstra stor; Stor; Middels; Liten; Annet
nl: Kamer grootte: Extra groot; Groot; Medium; Klein; Overig
hr-HR: Veličina komore: Iznimno veliko; Veliko; Srednje; Malo; Ostalo